Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1046.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3345.1(c), (i.2)(2)(i), (i.3), (i.4) and (j) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3345.1. Automated enforcement of failure to stop for school bus with flashing red lights.* * *(c) Penalty.--For each violation of this section, the owner of the motor vehicle shall be subject to a penalty as follows:(1) The penalty for the violation shall be [a fine of $300. The fine shall be distributed as follows:] assessed according to the following schedule:(i) $100 for a first violation.(ii) $200 for a second violation within 12 months of 12345678910111213141516171819 the first offense.(iii) $300 for a third or subsequent violation within 12 months.(iv) In cases of egregious conduct, including passing the bus at high speed or while children are visibly in the roadway, law enforcement may impose a $300 fine, regardless of the schedule under this paragraph, consistent with Pennsylvania State Police guidance.(1.1) Fines under paragraph (1) shall be distributed as follows:(i) [$250] eighty percent to the school entity where the violation occurred and which authorized the use of a side stop signal arm enforcement system, which shall be utilized for the installation, administration or maintenance of side stop signal arm enforcement systems, including through a system administrator under an agreement with the school entity, on school buses;(ii) [$25] ten percent to the primary police department that reviewed the submitted evidence as required under subsection (h.2); and(iii) [$25] ten percent to the School Bus Safety Grant Program Account.[(1.1)] (1.2) The fine under paragraph (1) shall not be subject to 42 Pa.C.S. § 3571 (relating to Commonwealth portion of fines, etc.) or 3573 (relating to municipal corporation portion of fines, etc.).(4) A violation under this section shall not:(i) be deemed a criminal conviction;(ii) be made part of the operating record of the individual upon whom the penalty is imposed under section 20250SB1046PN1266 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points);(iii) be the subject of merit rating for insurance purposes; [or](iv) authorize imposition of surcharge points in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage[.]; or(v) be used for any commercial purpose.* * *(i.2) Notice of violation.--* * *(2) The notice of violation shall include all of the following:(i) A copy of the recorded image showing the motor vehicle[.], including instruction and an electronic link for the owner of the motor vehicle to view the recorded video of the alleged violation.* * *(i.3) Payment of fine.--Payment of the fine shall be as follows:(1) An owner of the motor vehicle may admit responsibility for the violation and pay the fine provided in the notice of violation personally, through an authorized agent, electronically or by mailing both the payment and notice of violation to the school entity or to a system administrator on the school entity's behalf.(2) Payment of the fine shall operate as a final disposition of the violation of this section.(3) [If] Except as provided under paragraph (4), if payment is not received within 90 days of the mailing date of the notice of violation, the school entity, or a system administrator on the school entity's behalf, may request an 20250SB1046PN1266 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable credit collection agency to resolve the payment amount owed.(4) If a hearing request to contest the violation has been timely filed under subsection (i.4), no collection action may be initiated under paragraph (3) until the contested violation has been resolved and a final disposition has been entered.(i.4) Contest of violation.--The procedure for contesting a violation of this section shall be as follows:(1) An owner of the motor vehicle may, within 30 days of the mailing date of the notice of violation, request a hearing before the department's hearing officer to contest liability either personally, by an authorized agent or by mailing a request in writing on the prescribed form or electronically. A hearing to contest liability may be in person or be conducted through live-stream synchronous video conferencing or similar virtual presence technology and shall be only at reasonable locations and times set by the school entity or the system administrator on the school entity's behalf.(2) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the school entity, or the system administrator on the school entity's behalf, shall in a timely manner schedule the matter before a hearing officer designated by the department within 30 days of the request made under paragraph (4). Written notice of the date, time and place of hearing shall be sent by first class mail or electronically to the owner of the motor vehicle and shall be provided at least 30 days prior to the scheduled hearing.(2.1) If a hearing is not scheduled within 30 days of 20250SB1046PN1266 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the request under paragraph (2), the violation shall be subject to dismissal unless the department demonstrates good cause for the delay. The burden of proof shall rest with the department to demonstrate good cause.(3) The hearing shall be informal and the rules of evidence shall not apply. The decision of the department's hearing officer shall be made within 45 days from the hearing date and shall be final, subject to the right of the owner of the motor vehicle to appeal the decision under paragraph (4).(3.1) The school entity, in coordination with the system administrator, if applicable, may enter into an agreement to designate a person to represent the school entity, or the system administrator on the school entity's behalf, to administer the hearing to contest liability under this subsection.(4) If, within 45 days of issuance of the decision of the department's hearing officer, the owner of the motor vehicle requests in writing an appeal of the decision of the department's hearing officer, the owner shall file the notice of violation and supporting documents with the office of the magisterial district judge for the magisterial district where the violation occurred. A magisterial district judge shall hear and decide the matter de novo and shall be restricted to finding an owner liable or not liable for violating this section and shall not assign damages to an owner or otherwise impose penalties on primary police departments, police officers, school entities, system administrators or other persons involved in the appeal process, except as otherwise provided under 42 Pa.C.S. § 1726 (relating to establishment of taxable costs), which may only be assessed to the school 20250SB1046PN1266 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity or system administrator on the school entity's behalf.(5) The school entity, or system administrator on the school entity's behalf, shall reimburse the department for the actual cost of the hearing officer designated under paragraph (2).(j) Department approval.--(1) No side stop signal arm enforcement system may be used without the approval of the department, which shall have the authority to promulgate regulations for the certification and use of such systems.(2) Any system installed prior to the effective date of this paragraph shall obtain department approval within six months of the effective date of the temporary regulations promulgated under paragraph (3).(3) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, regulations promulgated by the department under this section during the three years following the effective date of this section shall be deemed temporary regulations, which shall expire upon the prompt promulgation of final regulations. The temporary regulations shall not be subject to:(i) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(iii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) Participation in enforcement activities under this 20250SB1046PN1266 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be conditioned upon completion of a department approved training program designed for school entities, system administrators and primary police departments. The training shall address procedures for identifying and processing violations, certification of evidence by law enforcement, protection of personal information, compliance with notice and appeals requirements.(5) The department shall provide guidance to ensure that all individuals who operate school buses, including those employed by school entities and independent school bus contractors, receive training on the proper use of stop arms and signal lights in connection with enforcement activities under this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 3345.1(c) shall apply to violations occurring on or after the effective date of this section.(2) The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 3345.1(i.4) shall apply to hearing requests filed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) This section shall take effect immediately.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days or July 1 of the first school year beginning on or after the effective date of this section, whichever is later.20250SB1046PN1266 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526